Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-619
Bonds, notes, obligations of authority; not debts of State of Nebraska or any county.

The bonds, notes, and other obligations of an authority shall not be a debt of the State of Nebraska or of the county in which such authority is established, and neither the state nor the county shall be liable thereon, nor shall such bonds be payable out of any funds other than funds of the authority issuing the same.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 19, p. 662.